Utah statutes.
53A-15-403.   Local school boards' authority to direct adult education
programs.
A local school board may do the following:
(1)  establish and maintain classes for adult education, with classes being
held at times and places convenient and accessible to the members of the
class;
(2)  raise and appropriate funds for an adult education program;
(3)  subject to Sections 53A-12-101 and 53A-15-401, determine fees for
participation in an adult education program; and
(4)  hire persons to instruct adult education classes.
